Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.146

Application of chapter—Validation of proceedings.

This chapter shall apply to all actions and proceedings now pending in the courts of record of the state of Washington seeking relief under the terms of the uniform declaratory judgments act [this chapter]; and all judgments heretofore rendered; and all such actions and proceedings heretofore instituted and now pending in said courts of record of the state of Washington, seeking such relief, are hereby validated, and the respective courts of record in said actions shall have jurisdiction and power to proceed in said actions and to declare the rights, status and other legal relations sought to have been declared in said pending actions and proceedings in accordance with the provisions of said chapter. This chapter does not apply to state agency action reviewable under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1989 c 175 s 39; 1937 c 14 s 2; RRS s 784-17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.